Hawaii statutes.
§323F-4 Board meetings. (a) The
corporation board and each regional system board shall be exempt from part I of
chapter 92 and shall meet no fewer than four times a year; provided that the
regional system boards and the corporation board shall meet together at least
once a year. Each regional board shall meet at least six times each year;
provided that two of these meetings shall be public community meetings for the
purpose of informing the community and taking comment on the regional system's
performance if these meetings are in addition to the four board meetings. The
public community meetings shall be advertised in a newspaper of general
circulation in the regional system at least two weeks in advance.

(b) All business of the corporation board and each
regional system board shall be conducted at a regular or special meeting at
which a quorum is present, consisting of at least a majority of the directors
then in office. The corporation board and each regional system board shall
adopt procedural rules for meetings, not subject to chapter 91, that shall
include provisions for meetings via electronic and telephonic communications
and other methods that allow the boards to conduct business in a timely and
efficient manner. Any action of the corporation board or each regional system
board shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of those present and
voting at the meeting; except that a vote of two-thirds of the entire
membership of the respective board then in office shall be required for any of
the following actions:

(1) Removal by the corporation board or respective
regional system board of one of its members;

(2) Amendment by the corporation or a regional system
board of its bylaws;

(3) Hiring or removing a regional chief executive
officer;

(4) Filling of vacancies on a board; and

(5) Any other actions as provided by the corporation
or regional system board bylaws, except the hiring or removing of the chief
executive officer of the corporation. [L 1996, c 262, pt of §2; am L 1998, c
229, §5; am L 2007, c 290, §20; am L 2009, c 182, §11]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next